Massachusetts, session 194th, H4408.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 15A of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official
Edition, is hereby amended by adding the following section:-
Section 46. (a) Subject to appropriation, there shall be a hunger-free campus grant
program managed by the department to provide grants to public institutions of higher education
to address student food insecurity and hunger in order to support students in completion of their
career and technical education at the post-secondary level with the goal of enhancing the
workforce of the commonwealth. This grant program shall also be available to municipally
administered colleges and to minority-serving institutions as defined under 20 U.S.C. 1067k (3)
as determined by the United States Department of Education. Funding for the grant program may
include, but not be limited to, appropriations from the Education and Transportation Fund
established in section 2BBBBBB of chapter 29.
Using funding allocated under the grant program, the department may hire a director of
the program who shall report to the commissioner. The director shall develop guidelines and
of 4

procedures governing the grant making process and the program using available data pertaining
to student hunger. The director may also conduct any additional surveys the department deems
necessary to understand gaps in addressing student food insecurity and hunger eligible public
institutions higher education campuses across the commonwealth.
The guidelines and procedures that govern the program shall specify any requirements
applicable to eligible public institutions of higher education including, but not limited to: (i)
whether the institution has designated campus staff to interface with the department; (ii) the
existence and extent of any campus-level hunger awareness programs, including notification to
students of their rights to participate in federal and state food assistance programs; (iii) whether
the institution has established on-campus meal vendors to accept available federal and state
nutrition benefits; (iv) the existence or development of a student meal credit sharing program; (v)
income based standards by which grant levels are determined according to the student population
at each participating campus; and (vi) any other pertinent criteria as developed by the
department. The department shall further develop and deliver technical assistance to assist
eligible public institutions of higher education to meet the goals of this program.
(b) Subject to appropriation, the department shall award grants to institutions that have
met the guidelines and procedures established by the department. Upon recommendation by the
director of the program, the commissioner or a designee shall determine the amount of each grant
which shall be used by the institution to address food insecurity among its students in accordance
with the program and shall establish reporting guidelines for grant recipients.
(c) Annually, not later than July 1, the department shall submit a report on the hunger-
free campus grant program for the preceding fiscal year to the governor, the clerks of the senate
of 4

and house of representatives and the joint committee on higher education. The report shall
include the number and amounts of grants to eligible institutions well as a comprehensive
assessment of the program for the applicable year, including: (i) identifying the institutions
participating in the program; (ii) describing the activities of participating campuses; (iii) the level
of student engagement in activities; and (iv) the outcomes resulting from activities.
SECTION 2. Chapter 29 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition,
is hereby amended by adding the following section:
Section 2EEEEEE. (a) There shall be established and set up on the books of the
commonwealth a separate fund to be known as the Hunger-Free Campus Trust Fund
administered by the commissioner of higher education. The fund shall be credited with: (i)
revenue from appropriations or other money authorized by the general court and specifically
designated to be credited to the fund; (ii) interest earned on such revenues; and (iii) funds from
public and private sources such as gifts, grants and donations. Amounts credited to the fund shall
not be subject to further appropriation and any money remaining in the fund at the end of a fiscal
year shall not revert to the General Fund. Amounts credited to the fund shall be used to fund
grants made pursuant to the program, and for the cost of administration of such program by the
department of higher education.
(b) Annually, not later than October 1, the commissioner shall report to the clerks of the
senate and house of representatives, the joint committee on higher education and the house and
senate committees on ways and means on the fund's activity including: (i) the source and amount
of funds received; (ii) the amounts distributed and the purpose of expenditures from the fund;
of 4

(iii) any grants provided to public institutions of higher education and other stakeholder
organizations; and (iv) anticipated revenue and expenditure projections for the next year.
of 4